zh-TW: 頭盔燈罩設計: 自動變光; 固定; 被動式; 可變; 其他
fr: Design de l’ombre du casque: Obscurcissement automatique; Fixé; Passif; Variable; Autre
en: Helmet shade design: Auto-darkening; Fixed; Passive; Variable; Other
ro-RO: Design protecție împotriva luminii mască: Întunecare automată; Fix; Pasiv; Variabil; Altele
hu: Sisak árnyékolójának kialakítása: Automatikus sötétítés; Rögzített; Passzív; Átalakítható; Egyéb
pt-PT: Design de capacete com sombra: Escurecimento automático; Fixo; Passivo; Variável; Outro
ru: Затемнение маски: Автозатемнение; Несъемный; Пассивный; Сменный; Другое
es: Diseño de pantalla de careta: Oscurecimiento automático; Fijo; Pasivo; Variable; Otros
nb: Hjelmskyggedesign: Automatisk mørklegging; Fast; Passiv; Variabel; Annet
sk-SK: Dizajn clony prilby: Automatické stmievanie; Pripevnený; Pasívny; Variabilný; Iné
el: Σχέδιο σκίασης κράνους: Αυτόματη συσκότιση; Σταθερή; Παθητική; Μεταβλητή; Άλλο
hr-HR: Dizajn zatamnjivanja maske: Automatsko zatamnjivanje; Fiksno; Pasivno; Varijabilno; Ostalo
sv: Hjälmskärmsdesign: Automatiskt avbländande; Fast; Passiv; Variabel; Övrigt
da: Hjelmskærmdesign: Automatisk mørklægning; Fast; Passiv; Variabel; Andet
it: Modello della visiera del casco: Oscuramento automatico; Fisso; Passivo; Variabile; Altro
nl: Helmschaduwontwerp: Automatisch verduisterend; Vast; Passief; Variabel; Andere
pt-BR: Design formato capacete: Escurecimento automático; Fixo; Passivo; Variável; Outro
cs: Design štítu přilby: Automatické ztmavení; Pevný; Pasivní; Proměnlivá; Jiné
de: Helmvisierdesign: Automatische Verdunkelung; Befestigt; Passiv; Variabel; Sonstiges
ko: 헬멧 차양 디자인: 자동 어둡기; 고정; 수동; 가변; 기타
vi: Thiết kế độ bóng của mũ bảo hiểm: Tự động làm tối; Cố định; Thụ động; Thay đổi; Khác
th: การออกแบบสีหมวกกันน็อค: ปรับให้มืดลงอัตโนมัติ; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; แบบพาสซีฟ; ปรับได้; อื่นๆ
fi: Kypärän aurinkosuojan muotoilu: Automaattinen tummuminen; Pysyvä; Passiivinen; Muuttuva; Muu
pl: Projekt daszka kasku: Automatyczne przyciemnianie; Stałe; Pasywny; Zmienny; Inne
bg-BG: Дизайн на затъмняване на визьора на каската: Автоматично затъмняване; Фиксиран; Пасивен; Променлив; Други
lt-LT: Suvirinimo skydelio konstrukcija: Automatiškai tamsėjantis; Fiksuotas; Pasyvus; Keičiamas; Kita
tr: Kask Gölge Tasarımı: Otomatik karartma; Sabit; Pasif; Değişken; Diğer
zh-CN: 头盔遮罩设计: 自动变暗; 固定; 被动; 可变; 其他
sl-SI: Zasnova senčenja v varilnih čeladah: Samodejna zatemnitev; Fiksna; Pasivna; Spremenljiva; Drugo
ja: ヘルメットシェードのデザイン: 自動調光; 固定; パッシブ; 可変; その他